Oklahoma, session 2026, SB763.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4263 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The Ethics Commission shall promulgate rules to require the


reporting of expenditures for municipal ballot measure


communications. Such rules shall be similar to existing rules for


the reporting of state question communications.


B. As used in this section, “municipal ballot measure” means an


initiative or referendum, as provided for in Section 15-101 et seq.


of Title 11 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1266 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:42:52 AM

Req. No. 1266 Page 1